Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§671-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Health care provider" means a
physician, osteopathic physician, surgeon, or physician assistant licensed
under chapter 453, a podiatrist licensed under chapter 463E, a health care
facility as defined in section 323D-2, and the employees of any of them.
Health care provider shall not mean any nursing institution or nursing service
conducted by and for those who rely upon treatment by spiritual means through
prayer alone, or employees of the institution or service.

"Medical tort" means professional
negligence, the rendering of professional service without informed consent, or
an error or omission in professional practice, by a health care provider, which
proximately causes death, injury, or other damage to a patient. [L 1976, c 219,
pt of §2; am L 1977, c 167, §2; am L 1983, c 223, §1; am L 1984, c 267, §14; am
L 1987, c 283, §64; am L 1992, c 55, §1; am L 2009, c 11, §67 and c 151, §25]

Law Journals and Reviews

Keomaka v. Zakaib: The Physician's Affirmative Duty to
Protect Patient Autonomy Through the Process of Informed Consent. 14 UH L.
Rev. 801 (1992).

Holding Hawai‘i Nursing Facilities Accountable for the
Inadequate Pain Management of Elderly Residents. 27 UH L. Rev. 233 (2004).

Case Notes

Where certain counts of plaintiff's complaint alleged errors
or omissions in professional practice by a health care provider, thus falling
under the definition of "medical tort" under paragraph (2), court
properly ruled plaintiff could not proceed with those counts of suit without
first submitting them to medical claim conciliation panel as required by
§§671-12 and 671-16. 89 H. 188, 970 P.2d 496 (1998).

Where defendant doctor never properly established at trial
the "therapeutic privilege exception" to the requirement that
informed consent be obtained before starting patient on antipsychotic
medication, trial court erred in refusing to instruct jury concerning the tort
of negligent failure to provide informed consent. 98 H. 470, 50 P.3d 946
(2002).

An alleged "unnecessary, improper and intrusive
examination of a woman's breasts" where the doctor allegedly "fondled
the woman's breasts and squeezed the woman's nipples until they squirted milk
in the doctor's face" is an alleged "medical tort" as defined in
paragraph (2) because it is an alleged "error in professional practice, by
a health care provider". 93 H. 490 (App.), 6 P.3d 362 (2000).

Where defendant was a Hawaii nonprofit organization, which
served as the parent corporation of four affiliated hospitals in Hawaii,
including Kapiolani, a wholly-owned subsidiary of defendant, defendant was a
"health care provider" in the context of this chapter. 121 H. 235
(App.), 216 P.3d 1258 (2009).

Plaintiff's claims of neglect, abuse, and failure to provide
a safe home against care home defendants did not constitute "medical torts"
within the meaning of this section; thus, plaintiff was not required to submit
plaintiff's claims to a medical claim conciliation panel (MCCP) pursuant to §§671-12
and 671-16 as a condition for plaintiff to file suit against defendants, and
the circuit court erred in dismissing plaintiff's suit based on plaintiff's
failure to submit plaintiff's claims to a MCCP. 128 H. 405 (App.), 289 P.3d
1041 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next